test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-rukkoos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - rukkoos: # 1B kkoo-›ko
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Nom: rukkoos
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Gen: rukkoos
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Acc: rukkoos
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Ill: rukosân
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Loc: rukosist
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Com: rukosáin
    rukkoos+N+Sg+Abe: rukkoosttáá
    rukkoos+N+Ess: rukosin
    rukkoos+N+Par: rukosid
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Nom: rukoseh
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Gen: rukosij
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Acc: rukosijd
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Ill: rukosáid
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Loc: rukosijn
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Com: rukosijguin
    rukkoos+N+Pl+Abe: rukosijttáá
